Hawaii statutes.
§445-121 Penalty. (a) Any person
violating any provision of sections 445-111 to 445-121 shall be fined not less
than $25 nor more than $500, or imprisoned not more than one month, or both.

(b) In addition to subsection (a), any person
acting knowingly, who is either:

(1) Responsible for posting material in violation of
section 445-114; or

(2) The person organizing the event or the owner or
operator of the business advertised on the posted material,

shall remove the material within seventy-two hours after
receipt of written notice of the posting or seventy-two hours after the date of
the event advertised on the posted material, whichever occurs first. Failure
to remove the posted material within the time specified shall be punishable by
an additional fine of not less than $100 nor more than $200 per posted
material, or community service of not less than ten hours nor more than twenty
hours, or both. Such additional penalties shall not be imposed unless the
person received written notice of the posting or was responsible for posting
material in violation of section 445-114. [L 1965, c 233, pt of §1; Supp,
§155-130; HRS §445-121; am L 1998, c 181, §2]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next